Washington statutes.
RCW 41.35.600

Provisions applicable to plan 3—Plan 3 elements.

(1) RCW 41.35.600 through 41.35.720 apply only to plan 3 members.

(2) Plan 3 consists of two separate elements: (a) A defined benefit portion covered under this subchapter; and (b) a defined contribution portion covered under chapter 41.34 RCW.

(3) Unless otherwise specified, all references to "plan 3" in this subchapter refer to the defined benefit portion of plan 3.

[ 1998 c 341 s 201.]